Utah statutes.
69-1-1.   Notice by, authorized.

Whenever any notice, information or intelligence is required to be given the same may be given by telegraph or telephone. Any such notice, information or intelligence shall be delivered to the telegraph or telephone operator in writing and shall be delivered to the person for whom it is intended in writing by the operator at the receiving office, who shall, on request, certify thereon that the writing so delivered is a true copy of the original. Notice by telegraph or telephone shall be deemed actual notice.

